Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Electronic Notary Public Act:

(1) Electronic means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;

(2) Electronic document means information that is created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means;

(3) Electronic notarial act means an official act by an electronic notary public that involves electronic documents;

(4) Electronic notary public means a notary public registered with the Secretary of State that has the capability of performing electronic notarial acts in conformance with the Electronic Notary Public Act;

(5) Electronic notary seal means information within a notarized electronic document that includes the notary public's name, jurisdiction, and commission expiration date and generally corresponds to the data in notary seals used on paper documents;

(6) Electronic notary solution provider means a provider of any electronic notary seals or electronic signatures;

(7) Electronic signature means an electronic symbol or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document; and

(8) Notary public's electronic signature means an electronic signature which has been approved by the Secretary of State in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under section 64-316 as an acceptable means for an electronic notary public to attach or logically associate the notary public's official signature to an electronic document that is being notarized.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 2.